Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1207
Boundary change; initiated by petition.

On and after January 1, 1989, petitions to the State Board of Education to change educational service unit boundaries may be initiated by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of any educational service unit board or any school board. In addition, such boards shall initiate a petition for reorganization upon the receipt of a petition signed by ten percent of the legal voters of such educational service unit or school district and certified by the county clerk or election commissioner.

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2202.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 924;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 46.